District of Columbia statutes.
7-1205.02

Authority to limit access.

A mental health professional or mental health facility may limit the disclosure of portions of a client’s record of mental health information to the client or client representative only if the mental health professional primarily responsible for the diagnosis or treatment of such client reasonably believes that such limitation is necessary to protect the client from a substantial risk of imminent psychological impairment or to protect the client or another individual from a substantial risk of imminent and serious physical injury. The mental health professional shall notify the client or client representative if the mental health professional does not grant complete access.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 502, 25 DCR 5055
1981 Ed., § 6-2042.
1973 Ed., § 6-1634.